Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 1. Mental Health Trust Authority.

Cross references. —

For provisions related to the Mental Health Trust, see AS

37.14.001

—

37.14.099

.

Sec. 47.30.010.

[Repealed, § 7 ch 84 SLA 1981.]

Sec. 47.30.011.
Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority.

The Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority is established as a public corporation of the state within the Department of Revenue.

The purpose of the authority is to ensure an integrated comprehensive mental health program and to administer the office of the long term care ombudsman established in AS

47.62.010

.

The authority

shall, as provided in AS

37.14.009

, administer the trust established under the Alaska Mental Health Enabling Act of 1956;

may sue and be sued;

may retain the services of independent counsel when, in the judgment of the authority’s board of trustees, independent counsel is needed;

shall insure or indemnify and protect the board, a member of the board, or an agent or employee of the authority against financial loss and expense, including reasonable legal fees and costs, arising out of a claim, demand, suit, or judgment by reason of alleged negligence, alleged violation of civil rights, or alleged wrongful act resulting in death or bodily injury to a person or accidental damage to or destruction of property if the board member, agent, or employee, at the time of the occurrence, was acting under the direction of the authority within the course or scope of the duties of the board member, agent, or employee;

shall exercise the powers granted to it under AS

37.14.041

, subject to the limitations imposed by AS

37.14.045

; and

shall administer the office of the long term care ombudsman established in AS

47.62.010

.

The provisions of AS

44.62.330

—

44.62.630

do not apply to the Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority.

History.

(§ 26 ch 66 SLA 1991; am § 23 ch 5 FSSLA 1994; am E.O. No. 102 §§ 6, 7 (2001))

Sec. 47.30.016.
Board establishment, membership, quorum, fees, and expenses.

The authority shall be governed by its board of trustees.

The board consists of seven members appointed by the governor and confirmed by the legislature. The members appointed under this subsection shall be appointed

based upon their ability in financial management and investment, in land management, or in services for the beneficiaries of the trust;

after the governor has considered a list of persons prepared by a panel of six persons who are beneficiaries, or who are the guardians, family members, or representatives of beneficiaries; the panel shall consist of

one person selected by the Alaska Mental Health Board established by AS

47.30.661

;

one person selected by the Governor’s Council on Disabilities and Special Education;

one person selected by the Advisory Board on Alcoholism and Drug Abuse established by AS

44.29.100

;

one person selected by the Alaska Commission on Aging established by AS

47.45.200

;

one person selected by the Alaska Native Health Board; and

one person selected by the authority.

A member of the board appointed by the governor under (b) of this section may not

be an officer or employee of the state; or

within the preceding two years or during the member’s term of office have an interest in, served on the governing board of, or been employed by an organization that has received, during that same period, money from the mental health trust settlement income account under a grant or contract for services.

A quorum of the board is four members.

A member of the board is entitled to

an honorarium of $200 for each day or any part of a day spent at a meeting of the board, at a meeting of a subcommittee of the board, or as a representative of the board; and

per diem and travel expenses authorized for boards and commissions under AS

39.20.180

.

History.

(§ 26 ch 66 SLA 1991; am §§ 24, 25 ch 5 FSSLA 1994; am § 14 ch 131 SLA 1994; am § 3 ch 24 SLA 2004; am § 33 ch 99 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, under § 6, ch. 13, SLA 1992 and AS

01.05.031

, “Governor’s Council on Disabilities and Special Education” was substituted for “Governor’s Council for the Handicapped and Gifted.” In 1995, the reference in subparagraph (b)(2)(C) was changed from AS

44.29.110

to AS

44.29.100

to correct a manifest error.

In 1996, in paragraph (c)(2) of this section, “mental health trust settlement income account” was substituted for “mental health trust income account” pursuant to sec. 17, ch. 1, SSSLA 1994.

Cross references. —

For qualifications of initial members of the Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority, see § 51, ch. 66, SLA 1991 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2004 amendment, effective July 24, 2004, substituted “AS

47.45.200

” for “AS

44.21.200

” in paragraph (b)(2)(D).

The second 2004 amendment, effective June 26, 2004, substituted “AS

47.45.200

” for “AS

44.21.200

” in paragraph (b)(2)(D).

Sec. 47.30.020.

[Repealed, § 7 ch 84 SLA 1981.]

Sec. 47.30.021.
Term of office, vacancies, removal, and reappointment.

The members of the board serve staggered five-year terms. A member shall continue to serve until the member’s successor is appointed and confirmed.

A vacancy occurring in the membership of the board shall be filled within 60 days by appointment of the governor for the unexpired portion of the vacated term.

The governor may remove a member of the board only for cause, including incompetence, neglect of duty, misconduct in office, poor attendance, or lack of contribution to the board’s work. A member being removed for cause shall be given a copy of the charges and afforded an opportunity to publicly present a defense in person or by counsel upon not less than 10 days’ written notice. If a member is removed for cause, the governor shall file with the lieutenant governor a complete statement of all charges made against the member and the governor’s findings based on the charges, together with a complete record of the proceedings. The removal of a member for cause constitutes a final administrative order. A member seeking to appeal the governor’s removal of a member for cause under this subsection shall file a notice of appeal with the superior court under AS

44.62.560

.

Except for a trustee who has served two consecutive five-year terms, a member of the board may be reappointed. A member of the board who has served two consecutive five-year terms is not eligible for reappointment to the board until one year has intervened.

History.

(§ 26 ch 66 SLA 1991)

Cross references. —

For terms of initial members of the Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority, see § 51, ch. 66, SLA 1991 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

For temporary provisions relating members of the board with terms expiring March 1, 2020 and to confirmation of appointments to the board presented by the governor o the legislature during the second regular session of the Thirty-First Alaska State Legislature, see § 1, ch. 9, SLA 2020 in the 2020 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 47.30.026.
Officers and staff.

The board shall annually elect a presiding officer and other officers it considers necessary from among its membership.

The board shall employ a chief executive officer who shall be selected by the board. The chief executive officer shall be compensated at no less than range 26 of the pay plan for state employees under AS

39.27.011(a)

. The chief executive officer may

hire additional employees;

appoint hearing officers to perform the responsibilities set out in AS

47.30.031(b)(4)

; and

contract for the services of consultants and others.

The chief executive officer is directly responsible to the board.

The chief executive officer and employees hired under this section are in the exempt service under AS

39.25.110

.

History.

(§ 26 ch 66 SLA 1991; am § 2 ch 15 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2008, in (b)(2) of this section, “AS

47.30.031(b)(4)

” was substituted for “AS

47.30.031(b)(5)

” to reflect the 2008 renumbering of AS

47.30.031(b)(5)

.

Sec. 47.30.030.

[Repealed, § 7 ch 84 SLA 1981.]

Sec. 47.30.031.
Regulations.

The board shall adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) consistent with state law and the fiduciary responsibilities imposed by law on members of boards of directors of corporations having trust responsibilities.

The regulations shall address, but are not limited to,

the requirements of AS

47.30.056(h)

and (j);

procedures by which an aggrieved person or group who believe they have not received services that should be provided from the trust may apply to the authority for redress;

provisions that allow and encourage entities providing trust funded services to integrate those services with other community human services funded by other sources;

administrative adjudication procedures, including but not limited to

the acceptance of applications under (3) of this subsection;

investigations;

hearings; and

the issuance of administrative orders, as necessary;

provisions that establish a process for long-range planning for expenditures from the mental health trust settlement income account; and

criteria for determining the nature and extent of necessary services and related expenses to be funded by the trust.

History.

(§ 26 ch 66 SLA 1991; am § 39 ch 5 FSSLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1996, in paragraph (b)(6) [now (b)(5)] of this section, “mental health trust settlement income account” was substituted for “mental health trust income account” pursuant to sec. 17, ch. 1, SSSLA 1994.

In 2008, former paragraphs (b)(3) — (7) were renumbered as (b)(2) — (6) to reflect the 1994 repeal of former paragraph (b)(2), and an internal reference in (b)(4)(A) was conformed.

Administrative Code. —

For fiscal matters generally, see 20 AAC 40, art. 1.

For MHTAAR grants, see 20 AAC 40, art. 2.

For authority grants, see 20 AAC 40, art. 3.

For beneficiaries of the trust, see 20 AAC 40, art. 5.

For administration of the trust, see 20 AAC 40, art. 6.

For real property assets, see 20 AAC 40, art. 7.

Sec. 47.30.036.
Duties of the board.

The board shall

preserve and protect the trust corpus under AS

37.14.009

;

coordinate with other state agencies involved with programs affecting persons in need of mental health services;

review and consider the recommendations submitted under AS

44.29.140(a)(2)

, AS

47.30.666

(6), AS

47.45.240(a)(8)

, and AS

47.80.090

(13);

adopt bylaws governing its meetings, selection of officers, proceedings, and other aspects of board procedure;

make an annual written report of its activities to the governor and the public and notify the legislature that the report is available; and

fulfill its obligations under AS

47.30.046

.

History.

(§ 26 ch 66 SLA 1991; am § 26 ch 5 FSSLA 1994; am § 110 ch 21 SLA 1995; am § 34 ch 99 SLA 2004; am § 2 ch 34 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

A reference to “AS

47.45.240

(a)(10)” was substituted for a reference to “AS 47.44.230(a)(10)” in the amendment to paragraph (3) of this section made by § 34, ch. 99, SLA 2004, to reflect the 2003 renumbering of AS 47.44.230 as AS

47.45.240

.

Cross references. —

For provisions authorizing an exchange with the federal government of certain Mental Health Trust land for certain United States Forest Service land if the chair of the board of trustees of the Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority certifies that the conditions in sec. 6(a), ch. 22, SLA 2017, have been satisfied. The certification was made on January 4, 2019, and Chapter 22, SLA 2017, and the grant of the authority to complete the exchange took effect January 5, 2019.

Administrative Code. —

For fiscal matters generally, see 20 AAC 40, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2004 amendment, effective June 26, 2004, deleted “AS 44.21.230(a)(10)” following “submitted under” in paragraph (3) and inserted “AS 47.44.230(a)(10)” in that paragraph.

The 2008 amendment, effective August 20, 2008, substituted “AS

47.45.240(a)(8)

” for “AS 47.45.240(a)(10)” in paragraph (3).

Sec. 47.30.040.

[Repealed, § 7 ch 84 SLA 1981.]

Sec. 47.30.041.
Board advisors.

The commissioners of health and social services, natural resources, and revenue, or their respective designees, are advisors to the board.

History.

(§ 26 ch 66 SLA 1991)

Sec. 47.30.046.
Budget recommendations; reports.

The board shall annually, not later than September 15, submit to the governor and the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee a budget for the next fiscal year and a proposed plan of implementation based on the integrated comprehensive mental health program plan prepared under AS

47.30.660(a)(1)

. The budget must include the authority’s determination of the amount

recommended for expenditure from the general fund during the next fiscal year to meet the operating and capital expenses of the integrated comprehensive mental health program;

in the mental health trust settlement income account, if any, that is not reasonably necessary to meet the projected operating and capital expenses of the integrated comprehensive mental health program that may be transferred into the general fund; and

of the expenditures the authority intends to make under AS

37.14.041

and

37.14.045

, including the specific purposes and amounts of any grants or contracts as part of the state’s integrated comprehensive mental health program.

When the authority submits its proposed budget under (a) of this section, the authority shall also provide a report to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee, the governor, the Office of Management and Budget, the commissioner of health and social services, and all entities providing services with money in the mental health trust settlement income account, and shall make it available to the public. The report must describe at least the following:

the assets, earnings, and expenditures of the trust as of the end of the preceding fiscal year;

comparisons of the trust’s assets, earnings, and expenditures with the prior five fiscal years;

projections of the trust’s assets, earnings, and expenditures for the next five fiscal years;

the authority’s budget recommendations submitted under (a) of this section, and its reasons for making those recommendations;

the authority’s guidelines for the establishment of services; the provision of services shall be based on the principle that services paid for from the trust are provided to recipients as close to the recipient’s home and family as practical with due consideration of demographics, mental health service requirements, use of mental health services, economic feasibility, and capital expenditures required for provision of minimum levels of service;

forecasts of the number of persons needing services;

projections of the resources required to provide the necessary services and facilities; and

reviews of the status of the integrated comprehensive mental health program, including evaluation of program goals, objectives, targets and timelines, and overall effectiveness.

History.

(§ 26 ch 66 SLA 1991; am § 27 ch 5 FSSLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1996, in paragraph (a)(2) and, in 1997, in subsection (b) of this section, “mental health trust settlement income account” was substituted for “mental health trust income account” pursuant to sec. 17, ch. 1, SSSLA 1994.

Administrative Code. —

For fiscal matters generally, see 20 AAC 40, art. 1.

Sec. 47.30.050.

[Repealed, § 7 ch 84 SLA 1981.]

Sec. 47.30.051.
Submissions requiring use of trust money.

An agency or entity proposing an expenditure of money by the trust shall present its proposal to the authority under regulations adopted under AS

47.30.031

.

History.

(§ 26 ch 66 SLA 1991)

Administrative Code. —

For fiscal matters generally, see 20 AAC 40, art. 1.

For MHTAAR grants, see 20 AAC 40, art. 2.

For authority grants, see 20 AAC 40, art. 3.

Sec. 47.30.056.
Use of money in the mental health trust settlement income account.

The money in the mental health trust settlement income account established in AS

37.14.036

shall be used as provided in AS

37.14.041

, including to

provide an integrated comprehensive mental health program as required by this section;

meet the authority’s annual administrative expenses; and

offset the effect of inflation on the mental health trust fund.

Expenditures under (a)(1) of this section must provide for a reasonable level of necessary services to persons who

are mentally ill;

have an intellectual disability, a developmental disability, or both;

are chronic alcoholics suffering from psychoses;

as a result of senility, suffer major mental illness; and

need mental health services, as the legislature may determine.

The integrated comprehensive mental health program for which expenditures are made under this section

must give priority in service delivery to persons who, as a result of a mental disorder or of a disorder identified in (b) of this section,

may require or are at risk of hospitalization; or

experience such major impairment of self-care, self-direction, or social and economic functioning that they require continuing or intensive services;

may, at the discretion of the board, include services to persons who are not included under (b) or (c)(1) of this section.

In (b)(1) of this section, “the mentally ill” includes persons with the following mental disorders:

schizophrenia;

delusional (paranoid) disorder;

mood disorders;

anxiety disorders;

somatoform disorders;

organic mental disorders;

personality disorders;

dissociative disorders;

other psychotic or severe and persistent mental disorders manifested by behavioral changes and symptoms of comparable severity to those manifested by persons with mental disorders listed in this subsection; and

persons who have been diagnosed by a licensed psychologist, psychiatrist, or physician licensed to practice medicine in the state and, as a result of the diagnosis, have been determined to have a childhood disorder manifested by behaviors or symptoms suggesting risk of developing a mental disorder listed in this subsection.

In (b)(2) of this section, “persons who have an intellectual disability, developmental disability, or both” includes persons with the following neurologic or mental disorders:

cerebral palsy;

epilepsy;

autistic disorder;

severe organic brain impairment;

significant developmental delay during early childhood indicating risk of developing a disorder listed in this subsection;

other severe and persistent intellectual disability or developmental disability manifested by behaviors and symptoms similar to those manifested by persons with disorders listed in this subsection.

In (b)(3) of this section, “chronic alcoholics suffering from psychoses” includes persons with the following disorders:

alcohol withdrawal delirium (delirium tremens);

alcohol hallucinosis;

alcohol amnestic disorder;

dementia associated with alcoholism;

alcohol-induced organic mental disorder;

alcoholic depressive disorder;

other severe and persistent disorders associated with a history of prolonged or excessive drinking or episodes of drinking out of control and manifested by behavioral changes and symptoms similar to those manifested by persons with disorders listed in this subsection.

In (b)(4) of this section, “persons who, as a result of senility, suffer major mental illness” includes persons with the following mental disorders:

primary degenerative dementia of the Alzheimer type;

multi-infarct dementia;

senile dementia;

presenile dementia;

other severe and persistent mental disorders manifested by behaviors and symptoms similar to those manifested by persons with disorders listed in this subsection.

The authority shall adopt regulations defining the disorders identified in this section to reflect revisions in the diagnostic nomenclature of the health professions serving the beneficiaries of the trust. The authority shall review and revise the regulations as necessary. Regulations adopted under this subsection must be in the long term best interest of the trust and of persons with disorders equivalent to those identified in (b) and (c) of this section.

In this section, “an integrated comprehensive mental health program”

means public health programs and services that, on December 16, 1994, are separately recognizable and administered, without regard to the administrative unit directly responsible for the delivery of the service; among the services included are services for the mentally ill, community mental health services, services for the developmentally disabled, alcoholism services, and services for children, youth, adults, and seniors with mental disorders;

includes, at a minimum, each of the following services as appropriate:

emergency services on a 24-hour basis;

screening examination and evaluation services required to complete the involuntary commitment process under AS

47.30.700

—

47.30.815

;

inpatient care;

crisis stabilization services, which may include

active community outreach;

in-hospital contact;

mobile crisis teams of mental health professionals;

crisis beds to provide a short term residential program for persons experiencing an acute episode of mental illness that requires temporary removal from a home environment;

treatment services, which may include

diagnosis, testing, and evaluation of medical needs;

medication monitoring;

physical examinations;

dispensing psychotropic and other medication;

detoxification;

individual or group therapy;

aftercare;

case management, which may include

evaluation of needs;

development of individualized treatment plans;

enhancement of access to available resources and programs;

development of interagency contacts and family involvement;

advocacy;

daily structure and support, which may include

daily living skills training;

socialization activities;

recreation;

transportation;

day care services;

client and care provider education and support services;

residential services, which may include

crisis or respite care;

board and care;

foster care, group homes, halfway houses, or supervised apartments;

intermediate care facilities;

long-term care facilities;

in-home care;

vocational services, which may include

prevocational services;

work adjustment;

supported work;

sheltered work;

training in which participants achieve useful work experience;

outpatient screening, diagnosis, and treatment services, including individual, family, and group psychotherapy, counseling, and referral;

prevention and education services, including consultation with organizations, providers, and the public; and

administrative services, including appropriate operating expenses of state agencies and other service providers.

The authority shall adopt regulations regarding the services described in (i) of this section to reflect advances in the appropriate professions. The authority shall review and revise the regulations as necessary. Regulations adopted under this subsection must be in the long term best interest of the mental health trust.

History.

(§ 26 ch 66 SLA 1991; am § 28 ch 5 FSSLA 1994; am §§ 22, 23 ch 42 SLA 2013; am § 59 ch 3 SLA 2017)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1996, in subsection (a) of this section, “mental health trust settlement income account” was substituted for “mental health trust income account” pursuant to sec. 17, ch. 1, SSSLA 1994.

Cross references. —

For transitional provisions related to development of mental health income account mechanism, see § 43, ch. 5, FSSLA in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For fiscal matters generally, see 20 AAC 40, art. 1.

For MHTAAR grants, see 20 AAC 40, art. 2.

For authority grants, see 20 AAC 40, art. 3.

For beneficiaries of the trust, see 20 AAC 40, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective September 1, 2013, in (b)(2), substituted “have an intellectual disability, a developmental disability, or both” for “the mentally defective and retarded”; in (b)(4), deleted “senile people who” at the beginning, made related stylistic changes; in the introductory language in (e), substituted “ ‘persons who have an intellectual disability, developmental disability, or both’ ” for “ ‘the mentally defective and retarded’ ”, deleted (e)(3), which read, “mental retardation”, in (e)(6) substituted “intellectual disability or developmental disability” for “mental disorders”, and made related changes.

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, in (g), substituted “persons” for “senile people” and made related stylistic changes.

Sec. 47.30.060.

[Repealed, § 7 ch 84 SLA 1981.]

Sec. 47.30.061.
Definitions.

In AS

47.30.011

—

47.30.061

,

“authority” means the Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority established by AS

47.30.011

;

“board” means the board of trustees of the authority;

“trust” means the trust established by the Alaska Mental Health Enabling Act of 1956, P.L. 84-830, 70 Stat. 709.

History.

(§ 26 ch 66 SLA 1991)

Secs. 47.30.070 — 47.30.170.
[Repealed, § 7 ch 84 SLA 1981.]

Sec. 47.30.180.
[Renumbered as AS 47.30.880.]

Secs. 47.30.190 — 47.30.340.
[Repealed, § 7 ch 84 SLA 1981.]